Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201470-1903
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Rural Community-Based Energy Development Act:

(1) C-BED project or community-based energy development project means
a new energy generation project using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill
gas as the fuel source that:

(a) Has at least twenty-five percent
of the gross power purchase agreement payments flowing to the qualified owner
or owners or as payments to
the local community; and

(b) Has a resolution of support adopted:

(i) By the county board of each county in which the C-BED project is
to be located; or

(ii) By the tribal council for a C-BED project located within the boundaries
of an Indian reservation;

(2) Electric utility means
an electric supplier that:

(a) Owns more than one hundred miles of one-hundred-fifteen-kilovolt
or larger transmission lines in the State of Nebraska;

(b) Owns more than two hundred megawatts of electric generating facilities;
and

(c) Has the obligation to directly serve more than two hundred megawatts
of wholesale or retail electric load in the State of Nebraska;

(3) Gross power purchase agreement
payments means the total amount of payments during the first
twenty years of the agreement;

(4) Payments to the local
community include, but are not limited to:

(a) Lease and easement payments to property owners
made as part of a C-BED project;

(b) Contract payments for concrete, steel, gravel,
towers, turbines, blades, wire, or engineering, procurement, construction,
geotechnical, environmental, meteorological, or legal services or payments
for other components, equipment, materials, or services that are necessary
to permit or construct the C-BED project and that are provided by a company
that has been organized or incorporated in Nebraska under Nebraska law and
has employed at least five Nebraska residents for at least eighteen months
prior to the date of the project application for certification as a C-BED
project; and

(c)
Payments that are for physical parts, materials, or components that are manufactured,
assembled, or fabricated in Nebraska and that are not described in subdivision
(a) or (b) of this subdivision.

Such payments need not be made directly from power
purchase agreement revenue and may be made from other funds in advance of
receiving power purchase agreement revenue; and

(5)
Qualified owner means:

(a) A Nebraska resident;

(b) A limited liability company that is organized under the Nebraska
Uniform Limited Liability Company Act and that is made up of members who are
Nebraska residents;

(c) A Nebraska nonprofit corporation organized under the Nebraska Nonprofit
Corporation Act;

(d) An electric supplier as defined in section 70-1001.01, except that
ownership in a single C-BED project is limited to no more than:

(i) Fifteen percent either directly or indirectly by a single electric
supplier; and

(ii) A combined total of twenty-five percent ownership either directly
or indirectly by multiple electric suppliers;

(e) A tribal council;

(f) A domestic corporation
organized in Nebraska under the Business Corporation Act and domiciled in
Nebraska; or

(g)
A cooperative corporation organized under sections 21-1301 to 21-1306 and
domiciled in Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB629, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB561, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB888, § 102;

Laws 2013, LB283, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB402, § 1.
July 18, 2014
Business Corporation Act, see section 21-2001.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.

Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-101.